es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Accesorios y piezas para máquinas cardiovasculares > Accesorios y piezas para cintas de correr > Piezas de repuesto para cinta de correr: Motores de inclinación para caminadoras; Rodillos para caminadoras
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kestävyysurheilulaitteiden lisätarvikkeet ja -osat > Juoksumaton lisätarvikkeet ja -osat > Juoksumaton varaosat: Juoksumattojen kallistusmoottorit; Juoksumattojen rullat
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Acessórios e peças para máquinas de cardio > Acessórios e peças para esteira > Peças de reposição para esteira: Motores de inclinação para esteiras; Rolos para esteiras
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Tillbehör och delar till konditionsträningsmaskiner > Tillbehör och delar till löpband > Reservdelar till löpband: Lutningsmotorer för löpband; Valsar för löpband
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Accessori e ricambi per macchine cardio > Accessori e parti del tapis roulant > Parti di ricambio per tapis roulant: Motori di inclinazione per tapis roulant; Rulli per tapis roulant
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Zubehör und Teile für Cardiogeräte > Zubehör und Teile für Laufbänder > Ersatzteile für Laufbänder: Laufband-Steigungsmotoren; Laufbandrollen
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machine Accessories & Parts > Treadmill Accessories & Parts > Treadmill Replacement Parts: Treadmill Incline Motors; Treadmill Rollers
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材配件/零件 > 跑步機配件/零件 > 跑步機替換零件: 跑步機坡度馬達; 跑步機滾筒
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para máquina de cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para passadeira rolante > Peças de substituição para passadeira rolante: Motores de inclinação para passadeiras; Rolos para passadeiras
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องคาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่ลู่วิ่ง > ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่ลู่วิ่ง: มอเตอร์ปรับความชันลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า; ลูกกลิ้งลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour machines cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour tapis roulant > Pièces de rechange pour tapis roulant: Moteurs d’inclinaison pour tapis de course; Rouleaux pour tapis de course
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Аксесоари и части за машини за кардио > Аксесоари и части за бягащи пътеки > Резервни части за бягащи пътеки: Мотори за наклон на бягаща пътека; Ролки за бягаща пътека
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažery – příslušenství a díly > Běžecké trenažéry – příslušenství a díly > Náhradní díly pro běžecký pás: Motory pro náklon běžeckých pásů; Válce k běžeckým pásům
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动器械配件/零件 > 跑步机配件/零件 > 跑步机替换零件: 跑步机扬升电机; 跑步机滚筒
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Accesorii și piese pentru aparate de fitness > Accesorii și piese pentru benzi de alergare > Piese de schimb pentru benzi de alergare: Motoare de înclinare pentru benzi de alergare; Role pentru benzi de alergare
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Tilbehør og deler til kardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og deler til tredemøller > Reservedeler til tredemøller: Stigningsmotorer for tredemøller; Valser for tredemøller
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Príslušenstvo a diely kardio prístrojov > Príslušenstvo a diely pre bežecké pásy > Náhradné diely pre bežecké pásy: Motory na naklonenie bežeckého pásu; Valce bežeckého pásu
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Dodatki in deli za kardio naprave > Dodatki in deli za tekalne steze > Nadomestni deli za tekalne steze: Motorji za naklon tekalne steze; Valji za tekalne steze
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruoklių priedai ir dalys > Bėgimo takelių priedai ir dalys > Bėgimo takelių atsarginės dalys: Bėgimo takelių nuolydžio varikliai; Bėgimo takelių volai
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Pribor i dijelovi za kardio sprave > Dodaci i dijelovi za trake za trčanje > Zamjenski dijelovi trake za trčanje: Motori za nagib trake za trčanje; Valjci za trake za trčanje
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > カーディオマシン関連用品・部品 > トレッドミル関連用品・部品 > トレッドミル交換部品: トレッドミル用インクラインモーター; トレッドミル用ローラー
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Accessoires en onderdelen voor cardioapparaten > Accessoires en onderdelen voor tredmolens > Vervangingsonderdelen voor tredmolens: Loopbandhellingmotoren; Loopbandrollen
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makinesi Aksesuarları ve Parçaları > Koşu Bandı Aksesuarları ve Parçaları > Koşu Bandı Yedek Parçaları: Koşu bandı eğim motorları; Koşu bandı ruloları
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Tilbehør og dele til cardiomaskiner > Løbebånd – tilbehør og dele > Løbebånd – reservedele: Hældningsmotorer til løbebånd; Ruller til løbebånd
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek > Futópad-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek > Futópad-cserealkatrészek: Futópad dőlésszög-állító motorok; Futópadgörgők
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy tập tim mạch > Phụ kiện & bộ phận máy tập chạy bộ > Phụ tùng thay thế cho máy chạy bộ: Động cơ nâng dốc máy chạy bộ; Con lăn máy chạy bộ
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 카디오 머신 부대용품/부품 > 트레드밀 부대용품/부품 > 트레드밀 교체용 부품: 러닝머신 인클라인 모터; 러닝머신 롤러
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Аксессуары и детали для кардиотренажеров > Аксессуары и детали для беговых дорожек > Запасные детали для беговых дорожек: Моторы регулировки наклона для беговых дорожек; Ролики для беговых дорожек
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & ανταλλακτικά για μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ και εξαρτήματα διαδρόμων γυμναστικής > Ανταλλακτικά για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής: Μοτέρ κλίσης διαδρόμων γυμναστικής; Κύλινδροι διαδρόμων γυμναστικής
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Akcesoria i części do urządzeń cardio > Akcesoria i części do bieżni > Części zamienne do bieżni: Silniki wzniosu do bieżni; Rolki do bieżni